Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
In General

§ 57-1-1.
Declaration of public policy.

It is hereby declared that the state public welfare demands, and the state public policy requires:

That a balanced economic development of this state is essential.

That the reconversion from wartime economy to peacetime pursuits appears reasonably imminent, requiring a planning program for readjustment of employment to accord with employment problems necessarily arising from changed conditions.

That the present and prospective health, safety, morals, pursuit of happiness, right to gainful employment and the general welfare of the citizens demand as a public purpose the development within Mississippi of commercial, industrial, agricultural, manufacturing and tourism enterprises, herein called “enterprises” by the several counties, supervisors districts and municipalities, all herein called “municipalities.” “Enterprises” shall be construed to include expansion of such existing buildings and facilities, conditioned, however, that the municipality, if required by the Board of Economic Development, shall take security upon the existing building or buildings at the time of entering into contract for the expansion of existing buildings and facilities.

That the means and measures herein authorized to promote said enterprises are, as a matter of public policy, for the public purposes of the several counties, supervisors districts, municipalities, and of the State of Mississippi.

That the present and prospective promotion of health, safety, morals, pursuit of happiness, right to gainful employment, and the general welfare of the state requires the accomplishment of that which is herein and hereby authorized, in order to afford ready and attractive markets for farm and garden products, to develop natural resources and convert raw materials of farm, mine and forest into finished products for the general welfare of each of said municipalities and the entire state.

That the accomplishment of the things herein authorized to be done by the several municipalities will give to them local benefits peculiar to each.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-05; Laws, 1944, ch. 241, § 6; Laws, 1958, ch. 531, § 2; Laws, 1979, ch. 438, § 1; Laws, 1986, ch. 374, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

§ 57-1-2.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed herein, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Department” shall mean the Mississippi Development Authority.

“Office” shall mean an administrative subdivision of the department.

“Executive director” shall mean the executive officer of the department.

“Agricultural and Industrial Board,” “Department of Economic Development,” “Board of Economic Development,” “Department of Economic and Community Development” and “Mississippi Department of Economic and Community Development” wherever they appear in the laws of the State of Mississippi, shall mean the “Mississippi Development Authority,” operating through its executive director.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 438, § 3; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 26; Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 39; Laws, 1990, ch. 522, § 34; Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved August 30, 2000.).

§ 57-1-3.
Mississippi Development Authority seal.

The Mississippi Development Authority shall have an official seal, and all orders, findings, acts and certifications of the department shall be attested by such seal, and by the signature of the executive director; and when so attested, all orders, acts, findings and certifications of the department shall be competent evidence and shall be given full faith and credit in any proceedings of a court in this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936; Laws, 1940, ch. 147; Laws, 1944, ch. 241, § 1; Laws, 1950, ch. 190, § 1; Laws, 1952, ch. 171; Laws, 1960, ch. 142; Laws, 1979, ch. 438, § 2; Laws, 1980, ch. 560, § 25; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, §§ 324 and 325; Laws, 1985, ch. 417; Laws, 1986, ch. 500, § 44; Laws, 1988, ch. 466, § 13; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 27; Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 40; Repealed by Laws, 2017, ch. 402, § 11; Laws, 2017, ch. 404, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 57-1-5.
Executive director.

The Governor shall, with the advice and consent of the Senate, appoint an executive director who:

Shall have at least a bachelor’s degree, and

Shall be an experienced administrator and have at least five (5) years’ experience in at least one (1) of the following areas:

Industrial development, or

Economic development.

The executive director shall be the executive officer of the department in the execution of any and all provisions of this chapter, and his salary shall be fixed by the Governor.

The executive director shall have the following powers and duties:

To formulate the policy of the department regarding the economic and tourist development of the state.

To use and expend any funds from state, federal or private sources coming into the department for the purposes herein provided. State funds appropriated for the department shall be expended in accordance with the regulations governing the expenditures of other state funds.

To implement the duties assigned to the department and consistent with specific requirements of law, including but not limited to:

Support services to include legal, finance, data processing, personnel, communications and advertising, purchasing and accounting;

Research and planning;

Outreach, agency liaison and community development;

Tourism, business travel, and film;

Programs and assistance for existing state business and industry;

Recruiting new business and industry into the state;

Fostering and promoting of entrepreneurship and the creation of new business in the state;

Programs aimed at competing effectively in the international economy by increasing exports of state products and services and by promoting, developing and creating the conditions and programs that will bring about significant increases in investment in the state from other countries;

Programs relating to the development of ports;

Such other areas as are within the jurisdiction and authority of the department and will foster and promote the economic development of this state;

Salaries of the associate directors, deputy directors and bureau directors may be set by the executive director of the department. The positions of associate directors, deputy directors and bureau directors shall not be state service positions.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936; Laws, 1940, ch. 147; Laws, 1944, ch. 241, § 1; Laws, 1950, ch. 190, § 1; Laws, 1952, ch. 171; Laws, 1960, ch. 142; Laws, 1979, ch. 438, § 4; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 28; Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 41; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 37, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 57-1-7.
Department motor vehicle insurance.

The executive director may carry on each motor vehicle of the department property damage insurance and uninsured and underinsured motorists coverage for any physical damage which is sustained by such motor vehicles while such motor vehicles are being operated by a duly authorized department employee in the performance of his official duties. The coverage authorized in this section shall be purchased in a policy or policies written by the agent or agents of an insurance company authorized to do, and doing business, in this state, and the amount of coverage purchased shall be determined by the executive director. Premiums on such policies shall be paid as are other expenses of the department.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 547, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 13, 1998).

§ 57-1-9.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 92, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

[Codes, 1942, § 8936-06; Laws, 1944, ch. 241, § 7; Laws, 1962, ch. 173]

§ 57-1-10.
Mississippi Development Authority Legislative Oversight Committee created; membership; meetings; compensation; terms of office; vacancies.

There is created the Mississippi Development Authority Legislative Oversight Committee to serve in an advisory capacity to the Mississippi Development Authority (“MDA”) regarding matters under the jurisdiction of the MDA. The committee shall consist of six (6) members, two (2) members to be appointed by the Governor, two (2) Senators to be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor and two (2) Representatives to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives. The committee shall have no jurisdiction or vote on any matter within the jurisdiction of the MDA.

The committee shall meet quarterly and may meet at other times specified by the chairman of the committee.

A quorum of the committee shall consist of four (4) members. The committee shall elect from among its membership a chairman and vice chairman.

The MDA shall not be required to submit to the committee any information that it considers confidential or proprietary, or anything the disclosure of which may negatively affect a project it has under consideration.

Members of the committee who are not legislators, state officials or state employees shall be compensated at the per diem rate authorized by Section 25-3-69 and shall be reimbursed in accordance with Section 25-3-41 for mileage and actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. Legislative members of the committee shall be paid from the contingent expense funds of their respective houses in the same manner as provided for committee meetings when the Legislature is not in session. However, no per diem or expense for attending meetings of the committee may be paid to legislative members of the committee while the Legislature is in session. No committee member may incur per diem, travel or other expenses unless previously authorized by vote, at a meeting of the committee, which action shall be recorded in the official minutes of the meeting. Nonlegislative members shall be paid from any funds made available to the committee for that purpose.

The terms of the legislative members of the committee shall expire at the end of their terms of office, and the Governor’s appointees shall serve for a term concurrent with the term of office of the appointing Governor. Any vacancy on the advisory committee shall be filled by appointment by the original appointing authority for the remainder of the members’ unexpired term.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 38, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 57-1-11.
Rules and regulations.

The executive director is hereby authorized and empowered to promulgate and put into effect all reasonable rules and regulations that he may deem necessary to carry out the provisions of Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51, not inconsistent herewith.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-10; Laws, 1944, ch. 241, § 9; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 29, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 57-1-12.
Mississippi Development Authority to file annual report describing all assistance provided under the Advantage Mississippi Initiative.

The Mississippi Development Authority shall file an annual report with the Governor, Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Representatives not later than July 1, 2001, and each year thereafter, describing all assistance provided under Laws, 2000, Second Extraordinary Session, Chapter 1.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 60, eff from and after passage (approved August 30, 2000.).

§ 57-1-12.1.
Mississippi Development Authority to file quarterly reports regarding the net economic impact of incentives or assistance authorized under Sections 1 through 37 of Chapter 1, Laws of 2005, Third Extraordinary Session.

The Mississippi Development Authority shall prepare and file a quarterly report with the Secretary of State regarding the net economic impact on the state as a result of incentives or other forms of assistance authorized under Sections 1 through 37 of Chapter 1, Laws of 2005, Third Extraordinary Session, the number of enterprises benefited and the number of jobs created. Each report shall estimate the number of jobs created or retained at each enterprise or business as a result of the incentives or other forms of assistance authorized under Sections 1 through 37 of Chapter 1, Laws of 2005, Third Extraordinary Session.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 59, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 57-1-12.2.
Mississippi Development Authority to file annual report regarding tax credits, loans, rebates and grants made, approved or awarded as result of negotiations involving economic development projects; contents.

The Mississippi Development Authority (MDA) shall file an annual report with the Governor, Secretary of State, Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Representatives not later than October 1 of each year regarding all tax credits, loans, rebates and grants made, approved or awarded by MDA as a result of negotiations involving an economic development project. The report shall contain the following information:

The total amount of incentives approved or awarded;

The total amount of loans made by MDA;

The total amount of grants awarded by MDA; and

A description of standard terms for each loan program.

With respect to each client that receives or is awarded a tax credit, loan, rebate or grant referred to in subsection (1) of this section, the report shall include:

The name and county of operation of the recipient;

The amount of the loan, rebate or grant;

The purpose of the loan, rebate or grant;

The number of employees that the client agreed to hire, retain or train;

The amount of the financial investment that the client expects to make in this state as a result of the economic development project; and

A list of projects that have met contractual requirements and have been closed out by MDA.

The Department of Revenue shall provide MDA with the tax information that is required to be included in this report.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 517, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 57-1-13.
Plans for advertising and developing state.

It shall be the duty of the executive director to prepare and perfect plans for the advertisement and development of the state in such manner and through such means as he may deem proper and within such appropriations as shall be made for expenditure.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-01; Laws, 1940, ch. 147; Laws, 1944, ch. 241, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 30, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 57-1-14.
Confidentiality of client information concerning development projects.

Any records of the Department of Economic and Community Development which contain client information concerning development projects shall be exempt from the provisions of the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983 for a period of two (2) years after receipt of the information by the department.

Confidential client information in public records held by the department shall be exempt from the provisions of the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983 during the period of review and negotiation on a project proposal and for a period of thirty (30) days after approval, disapproval or abandonment of the proposal not to exceed one (1) year by the department in writing.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 524, § 21; Laws, 1990, ch. 502, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 57-1-15.
Interstate and federal cooperation; Economic Development Fund.

The department is hereby authorized to cooperate and coordinate with economic development commissions, travel and other similar commissions and boards, and/or other similar agencies of other states, the federal government, and with county, municipal and regional economic development, travel and other similar commissions or boards, or other agencies thereof, for the purposes of securing economic development within the State of Mississippi, and to accomplish this purpose, the department may contract for, receive and expend, state, federal and other funds; and to that end, there is hereby created within the department a special fund designated as the “Economic Development Fund,” to be kept separate and apart from all other funds and into which all funds received for the above-stated purposes shall be deposited and which funds are not appropriated by the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-02; Laws, 1940, ch. 147; Laws, 1944, ch. 241, § 3; Laws, 1958, ch. 512; Laws, 1966, ch. 233, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 31, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 57-1-16.
ACE Fund; creation; qualifications for assistance; rules and regulations.

As used in this section:

“Extraordinary economic development opportunity” means a new or expanded business or industry which maintains a strong financial condition and minimal credit risk and creates substantial employment, particularly in areas of high unemployment.

“Local economic development entities” means state institutions of higher learning or public or private nonprofit local economic development entities including, but not limited to, chambers of commerce, local authorities, commissions or other entities created by local and private legislation or districts created pursuant to Section 19-5-99.

“MDA” means the Mississippi Development Authority.

There is hereby created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the ACE Fund, which shall consist of money from any public or private source designated for deposit into such fund. Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. The purpose of the fund shall be to assist in maximizing extraordinary economic development opportunities related to any new or expanded business or industry or to assist a local unit of government as authorized in subsection (5) of this section. Such funds may be used to make grants to local economic development entities to assist any new or expanding business or industry that meets the criteria provided in this section when such assistance aids the consummation of a project within the State of Mississippi, or to make grants to a local unit of government as authorized in subsection (5) of this section.

Monies in the fund which are derived from the proceeds of general obligation bonds may be used to reimburse reasonable actual and necessary costs incurred by the MDA for the administration of the various grant, loan and financial incentive programs administered by the MDA. An accounting of actual costs incurred for which reimbursement is sought shall be maintained by the MDA. Reimbursement of reasonable actual and necessary costs shall not exceed three percent (3%) of the proceeds of bonds issued. Reimbursements made under this subsection shall satisfy any applicable federal tax law requirements.

The MDA shall establish a grant program to make grants from the ACE Fund created under this section. Local economic development entities may apply to the MDA for a grant under this section in the manner provided for in subsection (4) of this section. Local units of government may apply to the MDA for a grant under this section in the manner provided in subsection (5) of this section.

Any business or industry desiring assistance from a local economic development entity under this section shall submit an application to the local economic development entity which shall include, at a minimum:

Evidence that the business or industry meets the definition of an extraordinary economic development opportunity;

A demonstration that the business or industry is at an economic disadvantage by locating the new or expanded project in the county;

A description, including the cost, of the requested assistance;

A description of the purpose for which the assistance is requested;

A two-year business plan;

Financial statements or tax returns for the three (3) years immediately prior to the application;

Credit reports on all persons or entities with a twenty percent (20%) or greater interest in the business or industry; and

Any other information required by the MDA.

The MDA shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that:

The minimum requirements of this section and such other requirements as the MDA considers proper shall be met; and

If such requirements are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by this section as determined by the MDA shall be repaid.

Upon receipt of the application from a business or industry, the local economic development entity may apply to the MDA for assistance under this section. Such application must contain evidence that the business or industry meets the definition of an extraordinary economic development opportunity, a demonstration that the business or industry is at an economic disadvantage by locating the new or expanded project in the county, a description, including the cost, of the requested assistance, and a statement of what efforts have been made or are being made by the business or industry for securing or qualifying for other local, state, federal or private funds for the project.

The MDA shall have sole discretion in the awarding of ACE funds, provided that the business or industry and the local economic development entity have met the statutory requirements of this section. However, in making grants under this section, the MDA shall attempt to provide for an equitable distribution of such grants among each of the congressional districts of this state in order to promote economic development across the entire state.

The MDA may make grants to local units of government to assist the local unit of government in purchasing real property for the benefit of an existing industry that commits to maintain a minimum of one thousand three hundred (1,300) jobs for a minimum of ten (10) years after the date the grant is made.

Any local unit of government seeking a grant authorized under this subsection shall apply to MDA. The application shall contain such information as the MDA may require.

The MDA shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that:

The minimum requirements of this subsection and such other requirements as the MDA considers proper shall be met; and

If such requirements are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by this section as determined by the MDA shall be repaid.

The MDA shall promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, for the implementation of this section. However, before the implementation of any such rules and regulations, they shall be submitted to a committee consisting of five (5) members of the Senate Finance Committee and five (5) members of the House of Representatives Ways and Means Committee, appointed by the respective committee chairmen.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 4; Laws, 2005, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 34; Laws, 2008, ch. 506, § 4; Laws, 2014, ch. 518, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2014; Laws, 2019, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 57-1-17.
Publicity and advertising; research laboratory.

It shall be the duty of the executive director and he is hereby authorized to prepare and execute a program of publicity and advertising that will bring into favorable notice the industrial, commercial, recreational, educational and social advantages, opportunities, possibilities, resources, farm and dairy products, and facilities of the state, and in the preparation and execution of such program he may use any funds which may be appropriated or otherwise made available for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51. The department may erect, equip, maintain and operate a research laboratory for the purpose of finding new and additional uses for Mississippi products and is authorized and empowered to receive, use and expend any funds from state, federal or private sources which it may receive for that purpose.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-03; Laws, 1940, ch. 147; Laws, 1944, ch. 241, § 4; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 32, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 57-1-18.
Small Municipalities and Limited Population Counties Fund; definitions; creation; grant program; qualifications for assistance; promulgation of rules and regulations; annual report.

For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Limited population county” means a county in the State of Mississippi with a population of thirty thousand (30,000) or less according to the most recent federal decennial census at the time the county submits its application to the MDA under this section.

“MDA” means the Mississippi Development Authority.

“Project” means highways, streets and other roadways, bridges, sidewalks, utilities, airfields, airports, acquisition of equipment, acquisition of real property, development of real property, improvements to real property, and any other project approved by the MDA.

“Small municipality” means a municipality in the State of Mississippi with a population of ten thousand (10,000) or less according to the most recent federal decennial census at the time the municipality submits its application to the MDA under this section. The term “small municipality” also includes a municipal historical hamlet as defined in Section 17-27-5.

There is hereby created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the “Small Municipalities and Limited Population Counties Fund,” which shall consist of funds appropriated or otherwise made available by the Legislature in any manner and funds from any other source designated for deposit into such fund. Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any investment earnings or interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. Monies in the fund shall be used to make grants to small municipalities and limited population counties or natural gas districts created by law and contained therein to assist in completing projects under this section.

Monies in the fund which are derived from proceeds of bonds issued under Sections 1 through 16 of Chapter 538, Laws of 2002, Sections 1 through 16 of Chapter 508, Laws of 2003, Sections 55 through 70 of Chapter 1, Laws of 2004 Third Extraordinary Session, Sections 1 through 16 of Chapter 482, Laws of 2006, Section 15 of Chapter 580, Laws of 2007, Section 1 of Chapter 503, Laws of 2008, Section 42 of Chapter 557, Laws of 2009, Section 38 of Chapter 533, Laws of 2010, Section 41 of Chapter 480, Laws of 2011, Section 30 of Chapter 569, Laws of 2013, Section 4 of Chapter 530, Laws of 2014, Section 11 of Chapter 472, Laws of 2015, Section 19 of Chapter 511, Laws of 2016, Section 5 of Chapter 452, Laws of 2018, or Section 19 of Chapter 454, Laws of 2019 may be used to reimburse reasonable actual and necessary costs incurred by the MDA for the administration of the various grant, loan and financial incentive programs administered by the MDA. An accounting of actual costs incurred for which reimbursement is sought shall be maintained by the MDA. Reimbursement of reasonable actual and necessary costs shall not exceed three percent (3%) of the proceeds of bonds issued. Reimbursements under this subsection shall satisfy any applicable federal tax law requirements.

The MDA shall establish a grant program to make grants to small municipalities and limited population counties from the Small Municipalities and Limited Population Counties Fund. Grants made under this section to a small municipality or a limited population county shall not exceed Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00) during any grant period established by the MDA. A small municipality or limited population county may apply to the MDA for a grant under this section in the manner provided for in this section.

A small municipality or limited population county desiring assistance under this section must submit an application to the MDA. The application must include a description of the project for which assistance is requested, the cost of the project for which assistance is requested, the amount of assistance requested and any other information required by the MDA.

The MDA shall have all powers necessary to implement and administer the program established under this section, and the department shall promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, necessary for the implementation of this section.

The MDA shall file an annual report with the Governor, the Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Representatives not later than December 1 of each year, describing all assistance provided under this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 57; Laws, 2002, ch. 538, § 17; Laws, 2003, ch. 508, § 17; Laws, 2004, 3rd Ex Sess., ch. 1, § 71; Laws, 2006, ch. 482, § 17; Laws, 2007, ch. 580, § 16; Laws, 2008, ch. 503, § 2; Laws, 2009, ch. 557, § 43; Laws, 2010, ch. 533, § 39; Laws, 2011, ch. 390, § 2; Laws, 2011, ch. 480, § 42; Laws, 2013, ch. 569, § 31; Laws, 2014, ch. 530, § 5; Laws, 2015, ch. 472, § 12; Laws, 2016, ch. 511, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 2016; Laws, 2018, ch. 452, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2018; Laws, 2019, ch. 453, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2019; Laws, 2019, ch. 454, § 20, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 2019).

§ 57-1-19.
Municipal enterprises; certificate of public convenience and necessity.

The executive director is charged with the duty of making effective the declared public policy of the state and municipalities as hereinabove set forth, and for that purpose is hereby authorized and empowered to determine whether the public convenience and necessity require that any municipality shall have the right to acquire lands, and thereon to erect enterprises, and expansions thereof and thereto, conditioned, however, that the municipality, if so required by him, shall take security upon the existing building or buildings at the time of entering into contract for the expansion of existing buildings and facilities, and to operate them and to dispose of or rent, let or lease such lands and enterprises. Each municipality within this state shall have the right to apply to the executive director for a certificate of public convenience and necessity as to whether the general welfare requires that such municipality enter into a given enterprise. In determining whether such certificate shall be issued, the executive director may hold public hearings or private hearings, make such investigations as he may desire; and he shall have power to summon witnesses, administer oaths, hear testimony and make a record of all things had and done at such hearing or investigation, and may issue such certificates of convenience and necessity as he deems advisable.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-07; Laws, 1944, ch. 241, § 8; Laws, 1958, ch. 531, § 3; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 33, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 57-1-21.
Municipal enterprises; issuance of certificate.

The executive director shall investigate, find and determine upon application of any municipality therefor, as to whether a certificate of public convenience and necessity shall be issued to such municipality to engage in any of the enterprises deemed essential under the above declared public policy for the economic development and advancement of such municipality; and in considering and determining whether or not such certificate shall issue, the executive director shall find and determine affirmatively the following:

That there are sufficient natural resources readily and economically available for the operation of the particular enterprise for at least ten (10) years, but in no event less than the period of time for which any bonds may be issued for acquiring or constructing such enterprise.

That there is available a labor supply to furnish at least one and one-half workers between the ages of eighteen (18) and fifty (50) for each operative job in such enterprise within an area of twenty-five (25) miles from the proposed location.

That there are adequate property values and suitable financial conditions so that the total bonded indebtedness of the municipality, solely for the purposes authorized by Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51, shall not exceed twenty percent (20%) of the total assessed valuation of all the property in the municipality.

When the executive director shall have determined the foregoing facts favorably, he is authorized and empowered, having due regard to the promotion of the public policy and the general welfare herein declared, to issue or refuse to issue a certificate of public convenience and necessity to the municipality to engage in such enterprise. If and when such certificate is issued, it shall authorize the particular municipality to acquire, to own, to operate, to sell, to convey, to let, to lease or to rent the particular enterprise found suited to the general welfare of that municipality; but the certificate shall expire in twelve (12) months from its date unless within that time such enterprise shall have been established, subject, however, to any delays necessitated by any legislation or acts of God, delaying the establishment of the enterprise. In no event shall the executive director authorize any municipality actually to operate any enterprise, unless he shall further find and determine that the enterprise is well conceived, has a reasonable prospect of success, will provide proper economic development and employment, will add materially to the general welfare of the municipality, and will not become a burden upon the taxpayers of the municipality.

If and when a certificate is issued, the executive director therein shall fix and determine: (a) the extent and the amount to which the municipality may issue bonds or make expenditures for such enterprise; (b) what property may be acquired therefor; (c) the terms upon which such acquisition may be had; (d) what expenditures may be made, and the construction of buildings, and of equipment with its installation; and (e) the method of operation of the enterprise by the municipality. If the governing board of the municipality fails or refuses to follow the requirements made by the executive director in the certificate, then the members of the governing board of the municipality voting for such failure or refusal shall be individually and personally liable, and liable upon their official bonds for any loss that the municipality may sustain by reason of such failure or refusal to follow the requirements, and in addition may be compelled by injunction to comply with such requirements.

If the executive director refuses to issue a certificate, an appeal of such refusal may be taken by the municipality to the Governor in the manner and within the time that the Governor shall establish by executive order.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-08; Laws, 1944, ch. 241, § 9; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 34, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 57-1-23.
Municipal enterprises; power conferred to acquire lands, erect buildings, etc.

The several municipalities of this state, including counties, judicial districts of counties having two judicial districts, supervisors districts, cities, towns or villages, whether existing under special charters or otherwise, hereinabove called “municipalities,” are hereby authorized and empowered to make effective the provisions herein contained, for the general welfare of the state and of the several municipalities thereof. When and after such municipality shall have obtained therefor a certificate of public convenience and necessity, under the provisions of Sections 57-1-19 and 57-1-21, then it may acquire land by purchase, gift, eminent domain or otherwise for any such enterprise so thus approved, and may directly or by contract, such contract to be entered into and governed as now provided by law for other public contracts entered into by boards of supervisors, erect such buildings and structures as may be essential for such enterprise, may obtain for such enterprise the requisite appliances and equipment, and may operate such enterprise. The power thus to do is hereby generally conferred upon all such municipalities, and shall be in addition to all other powers now possessed without in anywise limiting or circumscribing them.

Any city or town in this state situated in a county bordering on the Mississippi River and situated not more than five miles from the proposed industrial site or location of any industrial plant or proposed site of such plant, authorized to be established, built and erected under the terms of Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51, such distance to be measured between the corporate line of any such city or town nearest such proposed site and the boundary of such proposed site nearest such corporate line, is hereby authorized and empowered to join with another municipality and subdivisions of government, as defined hereinabove, in the creation, establishment, acquisition, ownership, control, sale, lease, disposition and disposal of any such plant, plant site and/or other property, real and personal, acquired, owned, or otherwise possessed and controlled under authority of Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51, notwithstanding the fact that the said, or proposed, plant, plant site, and/or other property, real or personal, is situated in another supervisors district other than the supervisors district in which such city or town is situated. In all cases provided for in this subsection, all authority, powers, privileges and rights provided for in Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51, shall be and are hereby conferred upon and vested in such city or town and such other municipality as may join therewith, as herein authorized.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-09; Laws, 1944, ch. 241, § 12; Laws, 1958, ch. 526, § 1; Laws, 1960, ch. 144.